New Jersey, session 222, A729.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall establish a pathway for interstate reciprocity for a certificate of eligibility for a teacher who holds the equivalent of a valid certificate of eligibility in another state. b.    In order to be eligible for a certificate of eligibility pursuant to this section, an individual shall: (1)   hold a valid and current certificate of eligibility, or its equivalent, to teach issued by another state for which there is an equivalent and currently-issued New Jersey grade level or subject endorsement; (2)   have held employment as a public school teacher in the state in which the teacher holds the applicable certificate during one of the last two school years; (3)   submit an application to the State Board of Examiners that includes two letters of recommendation, one of which shall be from a current or former supervisor, principal, or employing public schools human resource officer; (4)   pass a criminal history record check in accordance with section 1 of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1); (5)   comply with the provisions of R.S.52:14-7; and (6)   satisfy any other requirement the State Board of Education deems necessary. c.     The State Board of Education shall not require a person eligible for a certificate of eligibility pursuant to the provisions of this section to complete a performance-based assessment or test of basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills as a condition of eligibility for a certificate of eligibility. 2.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall establish a pathway for interstate reciprocity for a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing for a teacher who holds the equivalent of a valid certificate of eligibility with advanced standing in another state. b.    In order to be eligible for a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing pursuant to this section, an individual shall: (1)   hold a valid and current certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, or its equivalent, to teach issued by another state for which there is an equivalent and currently-issued New Jersey grade level or subject endorsement; (2)   have held employment as a public school teacher in the state in which the teacher holds the applicable certificate during one of the last two school years; (3)   submit an application to the State Board of Examiners that includes two letters of recommendation, one of which shall be from a current or former supervisor, principal, or employing public schools human resource officer; (4)   pass a criminal history record check in accordance with section 1 of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1); (5)   comply with the provisions of R.S.52:14-7; and (6)   satisfy any other requirement the State Board of Education deems necessary. c.     The State Board of Education shall not require a person eligible for a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing pursuant to the provisions of this section to complete a performance-based assessment or test of basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills as a condition of eligibility for a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing 3.    The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.